Nevada, session 83, AB169.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 687B.225 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.225 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.0405, 689A.0412, 689A.0413, 689A.0418, 689A.0437,
689A.044, 689A.0445, 689A.0459, 689B.031, 689B.0312,
689B.0313, 689B.0315, 689B.0317, 689B.0319, 689B.0374,
689B.0378, 689C.1665, 689C.1671, 689C.1675, 689C.1676,
695A.1843, 695A.1856, 695A.1865, 695A.1874, 695B.1912,
695B.1913, 695B.1914, 695B.1919, 695B.19197, 695B.1924,
695B.1925, 695B.1942, 695C.1696, 695C.1699, 695C.1713,
695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743, 695C.1745, 695C.1751,
695G.170, 695G.1705, 695G.171, 695G.1714, 695G.1715,
695G.1719 , [and] 695G.177, and sections 2.7, 4.7, 5, 7, 8, 9 and 12
of this act, any contract for group, blanket or individual health
insurance or any contract by a nonprofit hospital, medical or dental
service corporation or organization for dental care which provides
for payment of a certain part of medical or dental care may require
the insured or member to obtain prior authorization for that care
from the insurer or organization. The insurer or organization shall:
(a) File its procedure for obtaining approval of care pursuant to
this section for approval by the Commissioner; and
(b) Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a specific
statute, including, without limitation, NRS 689A.0446, 689B.0361,
689C.1688, 695A.1859, 695B.19087, 695C.16932 and 695G.1703,
respond to any request for approval by the insured or member
pursuant to this section within 20 days after it receives the request.
2. The procedure for prior authorization may not discriminate
among persons licensed to provide the covered care.
Sec. 2. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2.3 and 2.7 of this act.
Sec. 2.3. 1. The provisions of NRS 689A.04033 to
689A.0465, inclusive, and section 2.7 of this act must not be
construed to require a policy that provides coverage only for a
specified disease or illness or other limited benefit to provide the
coverage set forth in those sections.
2. The Division shall not interpret the term “policy of health
insurance,” for the purposes of NRS 689A.04033 to 689A.0465,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
inclusive, and section 2.7 of this act, in a manner contrary to the
provisions of subsection 1.
Sec. 2.7. 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for
habilitative speech-language pathology and rehabilitative speech-
language pathology as a treatment for stuttering for insureds who
are less than 26 years of age.
2. An insurer shall not:
(a) Set a maximum annual limit on the benefits described in
subsection 1, including, without limitation, a limit on the number
of annual visits to a speech-language pathologist;
(b) Limit the benefits described in subsection 1 based on the
cause of the stuttering; or
(c) Subject the benefits described in subsection 1 to medical
management techniques.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Habilitative speech-language pathology” means services
that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology which
help a person keep, learn or improve skills and functioning for
daily living.
(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or use of health care services or
prescription drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization and categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Practice of speech-language pathology” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 637B.060.
(d) “Rehabilitative speech-language pathology” means
services that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology
which help a person restore or improve skills and functioning for
daily living that have been lost or impaired.
Sec. 3. NRS 689A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.330 If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for
delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance
commissioner or corresponding public officer of that other state has
informed the Commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval
or disapproval by that officer, the Commissioner may by ruling
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
require that the policy meet the standards set forth in NRS 689A.030
to 689A.320, inclusive [.] , and sections 2.3 and 2.7 of this act.
Sec. 4. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 4.3 and 4.7 of this act.
Sec. 4.3. 1. The provisions of NRS 689B.0303 to
689B.0379, inclusive, and section 4.7 of this act must not be
construed to require a policy that provides coverage only for a
specified disease or illness or other limited benefit to provide the
coverage set forth in those sections.
2. The Division shall not interpret the term “policy of group
health insurance,” for the purposes of NRS 689B.0303 to
689B.0379, inclusive, and section 4.7 of this act, in a manner
contrary to the provisions of subsection 1.
Sec. 4.7. 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for
habilitative speech-language pathology and rehabilitative speech-
language pathology as a treatment for stuttering for insureds who
are less than 26 years of age.
2. An insurer shall not:
(a) Set a maximum annual limit on the benefits described in
subsection 1, including, without limitation, a limit on the number
of annual visits to a speech-language pathologist;
(b) Limit the benefits described in subsection 1 based on the
cause of the stuttering; or
(c) Subject the benefits described in subsection 1 to medical
management techniques.
3. A policy of group health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any
provision of the policy that conflicts with the provisions of this
section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Habilitative speech-language pathology” means services
that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology which
help a person keep, learn or improve skills and functioning for
daily living.
(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or use of health care services or
prescription drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization and categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(c) “Practice of speech-language pathology” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 637B.060.
(d) “Rehabilitative speech-language pathology” means
services that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology
which help a person restore or improve skills and functioning for
daily living that have been lost or impaired.
Sec. 5. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall
include in the plan coverage for habilitative speech-language
pathology and rehabilitative speech-language pathology as a
treatment for stuttering for insureds who are less than 26 years of
age.
2. A carrier shall not:
(a) Set a maximum annual limit on the benefits described in
subsection 1, including, without limitation, a limit on the number
of annual visits to a speech-language pathologist;
(b) Limit the benefits described in subsection 1 based on the
cause of the stuttering; or
(c) Subject the benefits described in subsection 1 to medical
management techniques.
3. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Habilitative speech-language pathology” means services
that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology which
help a person keep, learn or improve skills and functioning for
daily living.
(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or use of health care services or
prescription drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization and categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Practice of speech-language pathology” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 637B.060.
(d) “Rehabilitative speech-language pathology” means
services that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology
which help a person restore or improve skills and functioning for
daily living that have been lost or impaired.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Sec. 6. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and section 5 of this act to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of NRS
687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 7. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall
include in the contract coverage for habilitative speech-language
pathology and rehabilitative speech-language pathology as a
treatment for stuttering for insureds who are less than 26 years of
age.
2. A society shall not:
(a) Set a maximum annual limit on the benefits described in
subsection 1, including, without limitation, a limit on the number
of annual visits to a speech-language pathologist;
(b) Limit the benefits described in subsection 1 based on the
cause of the stuttering; or
(c) Subject the benefits described in subsection 1 to medical
management techniques.
3. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the contract that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Habilitative speech-language pathology” means services
that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology which
help a person keep, learn or improve skills and functioning for
daily living.
(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or use of health care services or
prescription drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization and categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Practice of speech-language pathology” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 637B.060.
(d) “Rehabilitative speech-language pathology” means
services that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology
which help a person restore or improve skills and functioning for
daily living that have been lost or impaired.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Sec. 8. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the policy
coverage for habilitative speech-language pathology and
rehabilitative speech-language pathology as a treatment for
stuttering for insureds who are less than 26 years of age.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation shall not:
(a) Set a maximum annual limit on the benefits described in
subsection 1, including, without limitation, a limit on the number
of annual visits to a speech-language pathologist;
(b) Limit the benefits described in subsection 1 based on the
cause of the stuttering; or
(c) Subject the benefits described in subsection 1 to medical
management techniques.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Habilitative speech-language pathology” means services
that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology which
help a person keep, learn or improve skills and functioning for
daily living.
(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or use of health care services or
prescription drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization and categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Practice of speech-language pathology” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 637B.060.
(d) “Rehabilitative speech-language pathology” means
services that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology
which help a person restore or improve skills and functioning for
daily living that have been lost or impaired.
Sec. 9. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for habilitative
speech-language pathology and rehabilitative speech-language
pathology as a treatment for stuttering for enrollees who are less
than 26 years of age.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
2. A health maintenance organization shall not:
(a) Set a maximum annual limit on the benefits described in
subsection 1, including, without limitation, a limit on the number
of annual visits to a speech-language pathologist;
(b) Limit the benefits described in subsection 1 based on the
cause of the stuttering; or
(c) Subject the benefits described in subsection 1 to medical
management techniques.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Habilitative speech-language pathology” means services
that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology which
help a person keep, learn or improve skills and functioning for
daily living.
(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or use of health care services or
prescription drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization and categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Practice of speech-language pathology” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 637B.060.
(d) “Rehabilitative speech-language pathology” means
services that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology
which help a person restore or improve skills and functioning for
daily living that have been lost or impaired.
Sec. 10. NRS 695C.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or
in specific provisions of this title, the provisions of this title are not
applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a
certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not
apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to this title
except with respect to its activities as a health maintenance
organization authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.
2. Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives,
must not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to
solicitation or advertising by practitioners of a healing art.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
3. Any health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.110, 695C.125, 695C.1691,
695C.1693, 695C.170, 695C.1703, 695C.1705, 695C.1709 to
695C.173, inclusive, 695C.1733, 695C.17335, 695C.1734,
695C.1751, 695C.1755, 695C.1759, 695C.176 to 695C.200,
inclusive, and 695C.265 do not apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or
insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance Program
pursuant to a contract with the Division of Health Care Financing
and Policy of the Department of Health and Human Services. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
5. The provisions of NRS 695C.16932 to 695C.1699,
inclusive, 695C.1701, 695C.1708, 695C.1728, 695C.1731,
695C.17333, 695C.17345, 695C.17347, 695C.1736 to 695C.1745,
inclusive, 695C.1757 and 695C.204 and section 9 of this act apply
to a health maintenance organization that provides health care
services through managed care to recipients of Medicaid under the
State Plan for Medicaid.
6. The provisions of NRS 695C.17095 and section 9 of this act
do not apply to a health maintenance organization that provides
health care services to members of the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program. This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
7. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to:
(a) The officers and employees, and the dependents of officers
and employees, of the governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of this State; or
(b) Members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
 This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 11. NRS 695C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.330 1. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke any
certificate of authority issued to a health maintenance organization
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the Commissioner finds
that any of the following conditions exist:
(a) The health maintenance organization is operating
significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document,
its health care plan or in a manner contrary to that described in and
reasonably inferred from any other information submitted pursuant
to NRS 695C.060, 695C.070 and 695C.140, unless any amendments
to those submissions have been filed with and approved by the
Commissioner;
(b) The health maintenance organization issues evidence of
coverage or uses a schedule of charges for health care services
which do not comply with the requirements of NRS 695C.1691 to
695C.200, inclusive, and section 9 of this act, 695C.204 or
695C.207;
(c) The health care plan does not furnish comprehensive health
care services as provided for in NRS 695C.060;
(d) The Commissioner certifies that the health maintenance
organization:
(1) Does not meet the requirements of subsection 1 of NRS
695C.080; or
(2) Is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care
services as required under its health care plan;
(e) The health maintenance organization is no longer financially
responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its
obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;
(f) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect a mechanism affording the enrollees an opportunity to
participate in matters relating to the content of programs pursuant to
NRS 695C.110;
(g) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect the system required by NRS 695C.260 for:
(1) Resolving complaints in a manner reasonably to dispose
of valid complaints; and
(2) Conducting external reviews of adverse determinations
that comply with the provisions of NRS 695G.241 to 695G.310,
inclusive;
(h) The health maintenance organization or any person on its
behalf has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue,
misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive or unfair manner;
(i) The continued operation of the health maintenance
organization would be hazardous to its enrollees or creditors or to
the general public;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(j) The health maintenance organization fails to provide the
coverage required by NRS 695C.1691; or
(k) The health maintenance organization has otherwise failed to
comply substantially with the provisions of this chapter.
2. A certificate of authority must be suspended or revoked only
after compliance with the requirements of NRS 695C.340.
3. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization shall
not, during the period of that suspension, enroll any additional
groups or new individual contracts, unless those groups or persons
were contracted for before the date of suspension.
4. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is revoked, the organization shall proceed, immediately
following the effective date of the order of revocation, to wind up its
affairs and shall conduct no further business except as may be
essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of the organization.
It shall engage in no further advertising or solicitation of any kind.
The Commissioner may, by written order, permit such further
operation of the organization as the Commissioner may find to be in
the best interest of enrollees to the end that enrollees are afforded
the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing coverage for
health care.
Sec. 12. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan shall include in the plan coverage for habilitative
speech-language pathology and rehabilitative speech-language
pathology as a treatment for stuttering for insureds who are less
than 26 years of age.
2. A managed care organization shall not:
(a) Set a maximum annual limit on the benefits described in
subsection 1, including, without limitation, a limit on the number
of annual visits to a speech-language pathologist;
(b) Limit the benefits described in subsection 1 based on the
cause of the stuttering; or
(c) Subject the benefits described in subsection 1 to medical
management techniques.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(a) “Habilitative speech-language pathology” means services
that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology which
help a person keep, learn or improve skills and functioning for
daily living.
(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or use of health care services or
prescription drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization and categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Practice of speech-language pathology” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 637B.060.
(d) “Rehabilitative speech-language pathology” means
services that constitute the practice of speech language pathology
which help a person restore or improve skills and functioning for
daily living that have been lost or impaired.
Sec. 12.5. NRS 695G.090 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.090 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the provisions of this chapter apply to each organization and insurer
that operates as a managed care organization and may include,
without limitation, an insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance, an insurer that issues a policy of individual or group
health insurance, a carrier serving small employers, a fraternal
benefit society, a hospital or medical service corporation and a
health maintenance organization.
2. In addition to the provisions of this chapter, each managed
care organization shall comply with:
(a) The provisions of chapter 686A of NRS, including all
obligations and remedies set forth therein; and
(b) Any other applicable provision of this title.
3. The provisions of NRS 695G.127, 695G.1639, 695G.164,
695G.1645, 695G.167 and 695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, do not
apply to a managed care organization that provides health care
services to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid
or insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance Program
pursuant to a contract with the Division of Health Care Financing
and Policy of the Department of Health and Human Services.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 and 695G.1639 and
section 12 of this act do not apply to a managed care organization
that provides health care services to members of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
5. Subsections 3 and 4 do not exempt a managed care
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 13. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
section 16 of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to 432.133, inclusive,
432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to 444.430, inclusive,
and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all other provisions of
law relating to the functions of the divisions of the Department, but
is not responsible for the clinical activities of the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health or the professional line activities of the other
divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 14. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.408, 687B.692, 687B.723,
687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to 689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6
and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033 to 689B.0369, inclusive, and
section 4.7 of this act, 689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive,
689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287 and 689B.500 apply to coverage
provided pursuant to this paragraph, except that the provisions of
NRS 689B.0378, 689B.03785 and 689B.500 only apply to coverage
for active officers and employees of the governing body, or the
dependents of such officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in
the group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from
compensation required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the
compensation to which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be
paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To the extent federal financial participation is available,
the Director shall include under Medicaid coverage for
habilitative speech-language pathology and rehabilitative speech-
language pathology as a treatment for stuttering for persons who
are less than 26 years of age.
2. Except where necessary to obtain federal financial
participation, the Department shall not:
(a) Set a maximum annual limit on the benefits described in
subsection 1, including, without limitation, a limit on the number
of annual visits to a speech-language pathologist;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(b) Limit the benefits described in subsection 1 based on the
cause of the stuttering; or
(c) Subject the benefits described in subsection 1 to medical
management techniques.
3. The Department shall:
(a) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for
any waiver of federal law or apply for any amendment of the
State Plan for Medicaid that is necessary for the Department to
receive federal funding to provide the coverage described in
subsection 1.
(b) Fully cooperate in good faith with the Federal Government
during the application process to satisfy the requirements of the
Federal Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment
pursuant to paragraph (a).
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Habilitative speech-language pathology” means services
that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology which
help a person keep, learn or improve skills and functioning for
daily living.
(b) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or use of health care services or
prescription drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization and categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(c) “Practice of speech-language pathology” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 637B.060.
(d) “Rehabilitative speech-language pathology” means
services that constitute the practice of speech-language pathology
which help a person restore or improve skills and functioning for
daily living that have been lost or impaired.
Sec. 17. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 18. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 17, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)